Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3812
Enforcement; prima facie evidence.

(1) The Attorney General shall have authority to enforce the Kratom Consumer Protection Act pursuant to the Consumer Protection Act and the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act. This section shall not be construed to allow for a private right of action under the Kratom Consumer Protection Act even though such action is authorized under the Consumer Protection Act and the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.

(2) If a kratom product is found to be adulterated under section 71-3809 with ingredients not reflected on the label of the product, such violation of the Kratom Consumer Protection Act is also prima facie evidence of a violation of the Consumer Protection Act.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB901, § 13.
July 18, 2026
Consumer Protection Act, see section 59-1623.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.